Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-3007
Civil Legal
Services Program; created; use of appropriations; Commission on Public Advocacy; duties.

The Civil Legal Services Program is created. Appropriations
to the program and money in the Civil Legal Services Fund shall be used to
provide grants for civil legal services to eligible low-income persons. The Commission on Public Advocacy shall
distribute grants pursuant to section 25-3008.

Laws 2006, LB 746, § 3;

Laws 2009, LB35, § 16.